Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1192.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 916(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 916. Problem-solving courts.(a) Establishment.--The court of common pleas of a judicial district and the Municipal Court of Philadelphia may establish, from available funds, one or more problem-solving courts which have specialized jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, veterans courts, drug courts, mental health courts and driving under the influence courts, whereby defendants are admitted to a court-supervised individualized treatment program, and, in accordance with Subchapter A of Chapter 14 (relating to mothers treatment court pilot program), mothers treatment courts. The 12345678910111213141516171819 court may adopt local rules for the administration of problem-solving courts and their related treatment services. The local rules may not be inconsistent with this section or any rules established by the Supreme Court.* * *Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 14OTHER MINOR COURTSSubchapterA. Mothers Treatment Court Pilot Program SUBCHAPTER AMOTHERS TREATMENT COURT PILOT PROGRAMSec.1401. Scope of subchapter.1402. Definitions.1403. Mothers Treatment Court Pilot Program.§ 1401. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to the Mothers Treatment Court Pilot Program.§ 1402. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Office." The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts."Program." The Mothers Treatment Court Pilot Program established in this subchapter."Treatment court." A type of court aimed at addressing specific issues that certain individuals or groups of individuals may face. This term may also be referred to as a problem-solving court.20250HB1192PN1341 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1403. Mothers Treatment Court Pilot Program.(a) Establishment.--The Mothers Treatment Court Pilot Program is established within the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts for the purpose of supporting counties in developing, implementing and administering mothers treatment courts to provide support for mothers involved in the criminal justice system.(b) Guidelines and procedures.--No later than six months after the effective date of this section, the office shall establish guidelines and procedures for the program, which shall include the following:(1) Procedures for identifying and referring mothers to treatment courts.(2) Procedures to address the specific issues mothers face when involved in the criminal justice system.(3) Procedures for data collection and reporting on the effectiveness of treatment courts.(4) Other requirements for the program that the office deems necessary.(c) Implementation by counties.--A county may work with the office to implement a treatment court within the jurisdiction of the county. A county that implements a treatment court shall record and report each use of the treatment court, the outcomes of individuals who participate in the treatment court, the crimes for which participating individuals were charged and any other information the office finds applicable.(d) Report.--The office shall annually compile a report of information collected from counties that implement treatment courts and shall publish the information, with no personally identifiable information, on the office's publicly accessible 20250HB1192PN1341 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internet website.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1192PN1341 - 4 - 12